Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2442YH (3) 91 th/ns H.F. 614 Section 1. Section 307A.2, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Identify, within the primary road system, a network 3 of commercial and industrial highways in accordance with 4 section 313.2A . The improvement of this network shall be 5 considered in the development of the long-range program and 6 plan of improvements under this section . The commission shall 7 prioritize the improvement of the segment of the highway known 8 as United States highway 30 which crosses this state from the 9 Missouri river west of Missouri Valley to the Mississippi river 10 east of Clinton and shall include in its long-range program 11 under subsection 3 plans to expand all portions of the highway 12 consisting of two-lane roadways to four-lane divided roadways 13 until the entire length of the highway is made up of four-lane 14 divided roadways. 15